Wyoming statutes. Title 30 Mines and Minerals
Article 3. Communications, Fire Prevention and First Aid

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

58 C.J.S. Mines and Minerals § 377.

§ 30-3-301.
Telephone service or communication facilities; location; insulation; protection; additional standards by rule.

Telephone service or equivalent communication facilities installed to reduce the possibility of interruption of service shall be provided in underground mines at the bottom of each main shaft or slope and in all mines from the surface to the working sections of the mine.

Telephone lines, other than cables, shall be:

Carried on insulators;

Installed on the opposite side from power or trolley wires;

Adequately insulated where they cross power or trolley wires.

Telephone circuits shall be protected by lightning arresters.

The inspector shall adopt additional rules for telephone and communication safety.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 128, § 50; W.S. 1957, § 30-176; W.S. 1977, § 30-3-451; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2; 1995, ch 31, § 1.

Library references. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
201.06 (Matthew Bender).

§ 30-3-302.
Fire-fighting equipment; fire prevention regulations.

Each mine shall be provided with suitable fire-fighting equipment, adequate for the size of the mine, such as supplies of rock dust at doors and at other strategic places, water lines and hose, water chemical trucks and fire extinguishers to provide reasonably effective means of controlling fires. The inspector shall establish by rule additional fire protection requirements, including:

Equipment required to be available at specified areas of the mine;

Required examinations for fire after blasting and other operations;

Storage requirements for materials and equipment; and

Procedures to be followed in the event of a mine explosion or fire.

through (m) Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 31, § 2.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 128, § 57; 1957, ch. 160, § 44; W.S. 1957, §§ 30-80, 30-183; W.S. 1977, §§ 30-2-417, 30-3-458; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2; 1995, ch 31, §§ 1, 2.

§ 30-3-303.
Fire danger to be minimized; when open flame prohibited.

All structures or installations either underground or above ground shall be constructed to minimize the danger of fire.

No material shall be stored underground or above ground that creates or constitutes a fire hazard.

Smoking or the use of an open flame is prohibited where it constitutes a serious hazard.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 160, § 44; W.S. 1957, § 30-80; W.S. 1977, § 30-2-417; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2.

§ 30-3-304.
Use of arc, spark or open flame prohibited; exceptions; search for flame-producing devices; welding and cutting operations; nonpermissible electric lamps prohibited.

All persons in underground workings of a mine are prohibited from intentionally creating any arc, spark or open flame, except those that cannot be avoided in the normal performance of work. Carrying smoking material or matches, or other flame-making devices into a mine or smoking underground is prohibited.

Before entering the mine, employees shall be subject to search by the mine foreman or his certified designee for smoking materials or matches, or other flame-producing devices.

In all underground mines welding and cutting with electricity or flame is restricted from places where flammable gases are present or where flammable gases may enter the air course except necessary welding and cutting in face regions. In the face regions of gassy mines, necessary welding and cutting in face regions shall be under the direct supervision of a qualified person, who shall test for gas before starting operations and frequently thereafter. Continuous monitoring devices may be used after the initial gas test has been made. In all welding and cutting operations, precautions shall be taken against starting a fire.

All persons underground shall use only permissible electric lamps for portable illumination.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 128, §§ 61, 62; W.S. 1957, §§ 30-187, 30-188; W.S. 1977, §§ 30-3-462, 30-3-463; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2; 1995, ch 31, § 1; 1998, ch. 37, § 1.

§ 30-3-305.
First-aid equipment and training standards established by rule.

through (d) Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 31, § 2.

The inspector shall establish by rule standards for first-aid equipment and training, and ambulance and physician services required on the surface and throughout the mine.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 128, § 64; 1957, ch. 160, § 45; W.S. 1957, §§ 30-81, 30-190; W.S. 1977, §§ 30-2-418, 30-3-465; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2; 1995, ch 31, §§ 1, 2.